Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,119
Hospital authority; order of dissolution; effect.

If the county board shall enter an order, as provided in section 23-35,118, that the need for such authority no longer exists, except for the winding up of its affairs in accordance with the plan approved by the county board, its authorities, powers and duties to transact business or to function shall cease to exist as of that date set forth in the order of the county board.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 46;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.119.